Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-558
Cytomegalovirus; informational materials; department; duties.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and publish informational materials for women who may become pregnant, expectant parents, and parents of infants regarding:

(a) The incidence of cytomegalovirus;

(b) The transmission of cytomegalovirus to pregnant women and women who may become pregnant;

(c) Birth defects caused by congenital cytomegalovirus;

(d) Methods of diagnosing congenital cytomegalovirus;

(e) Available preventative measures to avoid the infection of women who are pregnant or who may become pregnant; and

(f) Early interventions, treatment, and services available for children diagnosed with congenital cytomegalovirus.

(2) The department shall publish such informational materials on its website and make the materials available to child care facilities, school nurses, hospitals, birthing facilities as defined in section 71-4736, and health care providers offering care to pregnant women and infants.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 34.